src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection

!! Erzya proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Male given name for deriving patronyms 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
!! Андрей:Андре
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:евич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:евна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:й PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP-PATR-MAL_END-IN-CH/DZ ! from urj-Cyrl-propernouns.lexc
 PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ьич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:ьевич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:ьевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ьич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:иевич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:иевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:евич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:евна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ь PROP_KAL_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
!! Вили:Вил
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:ьевич PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:ьевна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:и PROP_KAL_MAL ;


LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
+Der/PatrMal+Err/Orth-colloq:ыч PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrMal:ович PROP_OSH_PATRMAL ;
!+Der/PatrFem:овна PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_KAL_MAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Russian type Surnames 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL
!! Абдеев:Абдеев
: PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
!:а PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL
!! Багрий:Багр
:ий PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
!:яя PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL
!! Аморский:Аморск
:ий PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
!:ая PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL
:ой PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
!:ая PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-YJ_SURMAL
:ый PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
!:ая PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL_SURMAL
+Sem/Mal-Sur: N_KAL-Derivation ;
+Sem/Mal-Sur: N_KAL-Def-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Sur: _KAL-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Mal-Sur: N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM
+Sem/Fem-Sur: N_KUDO-Derivation ;
+Sem/Fem-Sur: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Sem/Fem-Sur: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Fem-Sur: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_SUR
+Sem/Sur: N_KAL-Derivation ;
+Sem/Sur: N_KAL-Def-Declension ;
+Sem/Sur: _KAL-Indef-Declension ;
+Sem/Sur: N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;


LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR
 PROP_KIT_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-L_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR
 PROP_LAK_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
 PROP_OSH_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_SUR
+Sem/Sur: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUR
+Sem/Sur: NMN_KUDO ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya Homestead names !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_HOMESTEAD
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_PEJ_HOMESTEAD
+Sem/Plc: NMN_PEJ ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_HOMESTEAD
+Sem/Plc: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_HOMESTEAD
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KUDO ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL
:%>%{оеэØ%} LAT-INDEF ;
: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KEL1
:%>%{оеэØ%} LAT-INDEF ;
: NMN_KEL1 ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT
:%>%{оеэØ%} LAT-INDEF ;
: NMN_KIT ;

!LEXICON PROP-PLC_OSH
!:%>%{оеэØ%} LAT-INDEF ;
!: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO
:%> LAT-INDEF ;
: NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_VELE
:%> LAT-INDEF ;
: NMN_VELE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya settlements !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
!:%>%{оеэØ%} LAT-INDEF ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KIT
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KIT ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_PANGO
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO
@U.DECL-NX.SP@+Sem/Plc:@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
+Sem/Plc: NMN_KUDO ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Divinities !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_DIVINITY
: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_DIVINITY
: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_DIVINITY
: NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY
: NMN_KUDO ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Constellations !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_CONSTELLATION
+Sem/Constellation: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_CONSTELLATION
+Sem/Constellation: NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON PROP_OSH-PL_CONSTELLATION
!+Sem/Constellation+Pl: NMN_OSH-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_PANGO_CONSTELLATION
!+Sem/Constellation: NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION
+Sem/Constellation: NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL_CONSTELLATION
+Sem/Constellation+Pl: NMN_KUDO-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_TESHTE_CONSTELLATION
+Sem/Constellation: NMN_TESHTE ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! TEXT NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!LEXICON PROP_KAL_TXT
!+Sem/Txt: NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON PROP_OSH_TXT
!+Sem/Txt: NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON PROP_KUDO_TXT
!+Sem/Txt: NMN_KUDO ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! HOLIDAYS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!LEXICON PROP_KAL_HOLIDAY
!+Sem/Event: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_HOLIDAY
+Sem/Event: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_HOLIDAY
+Sem/Event: NMN_KUDO ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! RIVER NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_RIVERS
+Sem/Rvr: NMN_KAL ;
LEXICON PROP_LAV_RIVERS
+Sem/Rvr: NMN_LAV ;

!LEXICON PROP_OSH_RIVERS
!+Sem/Rvr: NMN_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_RIVERS
+Sem/Rvr: NMN_KUDO ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL
: NMN_KAL ;
LEXICON PROP_KEL1
: NMN_KEL1 ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK
: NMN_LAK ;
LEXICON PROP_LAV
: NMN_LAV ;
LEXICON PROP_LEVKS
: NMN_LEVKS ;
LEXICON PROP_OZKS
: NMN_OZKS ;
LEXICON PROP_RECH1
: NMN_RECH1 ;
LEXICON PROP_OZIM1
: NMN_OZIM1 ;
LEXICON PROP_ROZ1
: NMN_ROZ1 ;
LEXICON PROP_TEV
: NMN_TEV ;
LEXICON PROP_TYL
: N_TYL ;
LEXICON PROP_GAJT1
: NMN_GAJT1 ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT
: N_KIT-Derivation ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
: N_KIT-Def-Declension ;
: _KIT-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_ART
: N_KIT-Derivation ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
: N_KIT-Def-Declension ;
: _KIT-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_JORK
:%{back%} N_JORK ;


LEXICON PROP_KENKSH
:%{frontSoft%} PROP_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_TENGUSH
+Err/Orth-front-linking-vowel:%{frontSoft%} PROP_OSH ;
 PROP_OSH ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH
: N_OSH-Derivation ;
: N_OSH-Def-Declension ;
: _OSH-Indef-Declension ;
: N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX ;

!LEXICON PROP_TESHTE
! N_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP_PEJ
 NMN_PEJ ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO
: N_PANGO-Derivation ;
: N_PANGO-Def-Declension ;
: _PANGO-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_VELE_IS-NE-DIM
+Der+Der/NJE+Der/Dimin+N+Prop: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Der+Der/NJE+Der/Dimin+N+Prop: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
+Der+Der/NJE+Der/Dimin+N+Prop: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
 
LEXICON PROP_VELE
!! Front-vowel stem
: N_KUDO-Derivation ;
: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO
: N_KUDO-Derivation ;
: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_PEJ_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_PEJ ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_LAK ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KIT ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl:%>TLoss NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;

LEXICON PROP_OSH_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON PROP_TESHTE_MAL
! PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

!LEXICON PROP_TINGE_MAL
! PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

!LEXICON PROP_PANGO_MAL
!+Sem/Mal: NMN_PANGO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP_VELE_MAL
+Sem/Mal: NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM
+Sem/Fem: NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON PROP_PEJ_FEM
+Sem/Fem: NMN_PEJ ;

!LEXICON PROP_LAK_FEM
!+Sem/Fem: NMN_LAK ;
