src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Ботужвеле+Sem/Plc:Ботужвеле PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "Batuševo" ;
Кенде+Sem/Plc:Кендь PROP-SETTLEMENT_PANGO  "Tšindjanovo" ;
Морго+Sem/Plc:Морг PROP-SETTLEMENT_PANGO  "Morga" ;
Саран% ош+Sem/Plc:Саран% ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "Saransk" ;
Азия:Азия PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "" ;
Аллах:Аллах PROP_KAL_DIVINITY  "XX" ;
Ало% пелькс:Ало% пелькс PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "" ;
Алоош:Ало#ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "Nižni Novgorod" ;
Аргум:Аргум PROP_KAL_DIVINITY  "" ;
Атямас+Sem/Mal:Атямас PROP_OSH  "" ;
Африка:Африка PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "" ;
Ашоош:Ашоош PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "Belgrad" ;
Будапешт:Будапешт PROP-SETTLEMENT_KIT  "Budapest" ;
Вармаава:Варма#ава PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "" ;
Варсоноф+Sem/Mal:Варсоноф PROP_KAL  "" ;
Вирьава:Вирь#ава PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "metsänemo" ;
Вить+Sem/Mal:Вить PROP_KIT  "" ;
Витя+Sem/Mal:Витя PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Вишка% Кечепуло:Вишка% Кечепуло PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Волга:Волга PROP_KUDO_RIVERS  "" ;
Гендус+Sem/Mal:Гендус PROP_OSH  "" ;
Дигань% ки:Дигань% ки PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Дормидонт+Sem/Mal:Дормидонт PROP_KIT  "" ;
Дуболго+Sem/Fem:Дуболго PROP_PANGO  "" ;
Емель+Sem/Mal:Емель PROP_KAL  "" ;
Епа+Sem/Mal:Епа PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Зось+Sem/Mal:Зось PROP_OSH  "" ;
Илимбург:Илимбург PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "" ;
Инекече:Инекече PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Инечи:Инечи PROP_KUDO_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Инешкай:Инешкай PROP_KAL_DIVINITY  "" ;
Инешки:Инешке PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "" ;
Инешки% паз:Инешки% паз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Инешкипаз:Инешкипаз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Ипать+Sem/Mal:Ипать PROP_KIT  "" ;
Ицял:Ицял PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "Itšalki" ;
Капит+Sem/Mal:Капит PROP_KIT  "" ;
Каргонь% Ки:Каргонь% Ки PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "linnunrata" ;
Кардазсярко:Кардазсярко PROP_PANGO_DIVINITY  "pihanhaltija" ;
Кастарго+Sem/Fem:Кастарго PROP_PANGO  "" ;
Керемедьпаз:Керемедьпаз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Кечепуло:Кечепуло PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Кондратей+Sem/Mal:Кондратей PROP_KAL  "" ;
Косакрандаз:Косакрандаз PROP_OSH_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Кузь+Sem/Mal:Кузь PROP_OSH  "" ;
Куломаатя:Кулома#атя PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "XX" ;
Кумбава:Кумб#ава PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "" ;
Курсякс:Курсякс PROP_OSH_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Ларя+Sem/Mal:Ларя PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Мартеште:Мар#теште PROP_TESHTE_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Мацеень% ки:Мацеень% ки PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Митит+Sem/Mal:Митит PROP_KIT  "" ;
Митыпер+Sem/Mal:Митыпер PROP_KAL  "" ;
Модаава:Мода#ава PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "" ;
Модапаз:Модапаз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Модя+Sem/Mal:Модя PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Мордовия:Мордовия PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "Mordva" ;
Москов:Москов PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "Moskova" ;
Муром:Муром PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "" ;
Никуш+Sem/Mal:Никуш PROP_OSH  "" ;
Нишкепаз:Нишке#паз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "ylijumala" ;
Озязкеть:Озязке PROP_KUDO-PL_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Озял:Озял PROP_KAL_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Оренбург:Оренбург PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "Orenburg" ;
Повадьвеле:Повадьвеле PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "" ;
Паз:Паз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Паргеле:Паргеле PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "" ;
Пелевень% курцякс:Пелевень% курцякс PROP_OSH_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Петрик+Sem/Mal:Петрик PROP_KAL  "" ;
Пилат+Sem/Mal:Пилат PROP_KIT  "" ;
Пиля+Sem/Mal:Пиля PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Рав:Рав PROP_KAL_RIVERS  "Volga" ;
Раськень% Озкс:Раськень% Озкс PROP_OSH_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Ратор:Ратор PROP_KAL_RIVERS  "" ;
Ратор% лей:Ратор% лей PROP_KAL_RIVERS  "" ;
Ратор% ош:Ратор% ош PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "" ;
Раторош:раторош PROP_OSH  "XX" ;
Сенипонт+Sem/Mal:Сенипонт PROP_KIT  "" ;
Сергунь+Sem/Mal:Сергунь PROP_KAL  "" ;
Спас:Спас PROP_OSH_HOLIDAY  "" ;
Стёпа+Sem/Mal:Стёпа PROP_KUDO  "" ;
Сярдо+Sem/Mal:Сярд PROP_PANGO  "" ;
Татарстан:Татарстан PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "XX" ;
Украина:Украина PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO  "Ukraina" ;
Чачома% Мастор:Чачома% Мастор PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL  "" ;
Чипаз:Чи#паз PROP_OSH_DIVINITY  "" ;
Штэпан+Sem/Mal:Штэпан PROP_KAL  "" ;
Юрталя:Юрт#аля PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY  "" ;
Як+Sem/Mal:Як PROP_LAK  "" ;
Яксяргонь% Пизэ:Яксяргонь% Пизэ PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION  "" ;
Яраш+Sem/Mal:Яраш PROP_OSH  "" ;
Ярук+Sem/Mal:Ярук PROP_LAK  "" ;
Эрьзямас:Эрьзямас PROP-SETTLEMENT_OSH  "" ;
